Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB948.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3354(f) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3354. Additional parking regulations.* * *(e.2) Electric vehicle charging station parking.--No person shall stop, stand or park a vehicle within a parking space specifically designated only for parking and charging an electric vehicle in accordance with departmental regulations unless the vehicle is an electric vehicle and begins receiving electricity from the charging equipment. A vehicle that is unlawfully parked under this subsection may be towed and may be reclaimed by the vehicle owner upon payment of the towing costs. 123456789101112131415161718 A vehicle may only be towed under this subsection if the parking space is posted with a sign indicating that vehicles in violation of this section may be towed.(f) Penalty.--A person violating subsection (a), (b) or (d)(1) is guilty of a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $15. A person violating subsection (d)(2) or (3) [or], (e) or (e.2) is guilty of a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $50 nor more than $200. If a person is convicted under subsection (d)(2) or (3) or (e.2) in the absence of a sign stating the penalty amount, the fine imposed may not exceed $50. A person violating subsection (d.1) is guilty of a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $300.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0948PN1016 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617